en: Plant-based mixed pickles, Mixed pickles
es: Mezcla de encurtidos vegetales, Mezcla de encurtidos, Mezclas de encurtidos
fi: kasvipohjaiset säilykesekoitukset
fr: Légumes au vinaigre
hr: Miješani kiseli krastavci na biljnoj bazi
nl: Ingemaakte gemengde groenten
tr: Karışık sebze turşusu

en: Banderillas
es: Banderillas, Banderillas en vinagre
fr: Banderillas
hr: Banderilje

en: Olives
bg: Маслини
ca: Olives
cs: Olivy
da: Oliven
de: Oliven
es: Aceitunas, Olivas
fi: oliivit
fr: Olives
he: זיתים
hr: Masline
hu: Olívák
it: Olive
ja: オリーブ
nl: Olijven
pl: Oliwki
pt: Azeitonas
ro: Măsline
ru: Оливки, Маслины
sv: Oliver, oliv
tr: Zeytin

en: Kalamon olives
sv: Kalamonoliver

en: Kalamata olives
sv: Kalamataoliver

en: Black olives
bg: Черни маслини
da: sorte oliven
de: schwarze Oliven
es: Aceitunas negras
fi: mustat oliivit
fr: Olives noires, Olive noire
hr: Crne masline
it: Olive nere
ja: ブラックオリーブ
nl: Zwarte olijven
pl: Czarne oliwki
pt: Azeitonas pretas
ro: Măsline negre
ru: Маслины чёрные, Чёрные маслины, Оливки чёрные, Чёрные оливки
sv: svarta oliver
tr: Siyah zeytin

en: Black olives in brine
bg: Черни маслини в саламура
fr: Olives noires en saumure
hr: Crne masline u salamuri
it: Olive nere in brina

en: Black olives in oil, Greek olives
de: Schwarze Oliven in Öl
fr: Olives noires à l'huile, Olives noires à la grecque
hr: Crne masline u ulju

en: Black chopped olives, chopped black olives
es: Aceitunas negras troceadas, Aceitunas negras en rodajas
hr: Crne nasjeckane masline
nl: Gehakte zwarte olijven
ro: Măsline negre feliate, Măsline negre tocate, Măsline negre mărunțite

en: Chopped olives
bg: Нарязани маслини
de: Gehackte Oliven, Oliven in Scheiben
es: Aceitunas troceadas, Aceitunas en rodajas
fr: Olives tranchées
hr: Nasjeckane masline
it: Olive tritate
nl: Gehakte olijven
ro: Măsline feliate, Măsline tocate, Măsline mărunțite

en: Cracked olives
es: Aceitunas partidas, Aceitunas machacadas
fr: Olives cassées
hr: Napuknute masline
nl: Gebroken olijven

en: Green olives
bg: Зелени маслини
ca: Olives verdes
da: Grønne oliven
de: Grüne Oliven
es: Aceitunas verdes
fi: vihreät oliivit
fr: Olives vertes
he: זיתים ירוקים
hr: Zelene masline
hu: Zöld olajbogyó
it: Olive verdi
ja: グリーンオリーブ
nl: Groene olijven
pl: Zielone oliwki
pt: Azeitonas verdes
ro: Măsline verzi
ru: Оливки зелёные, Зелёные оливки, Маслины зелёные, Зелёные маслины
tr: Yeşil zeytin

en: Green chopped olives, chopped green olives
es: Aceitunas verdes troceadas, Aceitunas verdes en rodajas
hr: Zelene nasjeckane masline
it: Olive verdi tagliate
nl: Gehakte groene olijven

en: Green cracked olives, cracked green olives
es: Aceitunas verdes partidas, Aceitunas verdes machacadas
fr: Olives vertes cassées
hr: Zelene napuknute masline
nl: Gebroken groene olijven

en: Cracked marinated green olives
es: Aceitunas verdes partidas aliñadas
fr: Olives vertes concassées marinées
hr: Napuknute marinirane zelene masline
nl: gemarineerde groene olijven

en: Gazpacha marinated green olives
es: Aceitunas verdes partidas aliñadas a la gazpacha

en: Green pitted olives, pitted green olives
bg: Зелени маслини без костилка
de: grüne kernlose Oliven, grüne entsteinte Oliven
es: Aceitunas verdes deshuesadas, Aceitunas verdes sin hueso
fi: kivettömät vihreät oliivit
fr: Olives vertes dénoyautées
hr: Zelene masline bez koštice
it: Olive verdi snocciolate
nl: Ontpitte groene olijven
ru: Зелёные оливки без косточки, Зелёные маслины без косточки, Оливки зелёные без косточки, Маслины зелёные без косточки

en: Pitted marinated green olives
es: Aceitunas verdes deshuesadas aliñadas
fr: Olives vertes marinées dénoyautées
hr: Marinirane zelene masline bez koštica
it: Olive verdi denocciolate marinate
nl: Ontpitte gemarineerde groene olijven

en: Green stuffed olives, stuffed green olives
de: Gefüllte Grüne Oliven
es: Aceitunas verdes rellenas
fi: täytetyt vihreät oliivit
fr: Olives vertes farcies
hr: Zelene punjene masline
it: Olive verdi ripiene
nl: Groene gevulde olijven
pl: Zielone oliwki nadziewane

en: Green olives stuffed of almond
de: Grüne Oliven gefüllt mit Mandeln, Grüne Oliven mit Mandelfüllung
es: Aceitunas verdes rellenas de almendra
fr: Olives vertes farcies aux amandes
hr: Zelene masline punjene bademima
nl: Amandelolijven
pl: Zielone oliwki nadziewane migdałami